Washington statutes.
RCW 26.25.030

Cooperative agreements—Contents.

An agreement established under this section may, but is not required to, address the following:

(1) Recognizing the state's and tribe's authority to address child support matters with the development of a process designed to determine how tribal member cases may be handled;

(2) The authority, procedures, and guidelines for all aspects of establishing, entering, modifying, and enforcing child support orders in the tribal court and the state court;

(3) The authority, procedures, and guidelines the department and tribe will follow for the establishment of paternity;

(4) The establishment and agreement of culturally relevant factors that may be considered in child support enforcement;

(5) The authority, procedures, and guidelines for the garnishing of wages of tribal members or employees of a tribe, tribally owned enterprise, or an Indian-owned business located on the reservation;

(6) The department's and tribe's responsibilities to each other;

(7) The ability for the department and the tribe to address the fiscal responsibilities between each other;

(8) Requirements for alternative dispute resolution procedures;

(9) The necessary procedures for notice and the continual sharing of information; and

(10) The duration of the agreement, under what circumstances the parties may terminate the agreement, and the consequences of breaching the provisions in the agreement.

[ 1997 c 386 s 62.]